Utah statutes.
43-1-2.   Transfer -- By delivery -- By endorsement -- Rights of transferee.

Title to any security receipt, or equipment trust certificate, which by its
terms entitles the bearer to the benefits thereof, may be transferred by
delivery by any person in possession of the same, howsoever such possession
may have been acquired.
Title to any security receipt, or equipment trust certificate, which by its
terms entitles the person named therein to the benefits thereof, and which
provides in substance that title thereto is transferable with the same effect
as in the case of a negotiable instrument, may be transferred by delivery by
any person in possession of the same, howsoever such possession may have been
acquired, if endorsed in blank or, if it is endorsed to a specified person, by
delivery by such other person.
A person to whom title is so transferred, who takes any such instrument for
present or antecedent value, without notice of prior defenses, equities or
claims of ownership enforceable against the transferor, shall have absolute
title thereto free of any defenses enforceable against, or claims of ownership
of, the signer or any prior holder. The holder of any such security receipt,
or equipment trust certificate, unless the same has been endorsed in blank by
such specified person, shall be deemed prima facie to have title thereto as
aforesaid; but when it is shown that the title of any person who has
negotiated such instrument is defective, the burden is on the holder to prove
that he, or some person under whom he claims, acquired title as a holder for
value and without notice as aforesaid.
The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to the transfer of any
security receipt, or equipment trust certificate, when it is shown that such
transfer was made after the date fixed therein for performance by the signer
of his obligations thereunder, or, if no date is so fixed, after the
expiration of a reasonable time after the happening of the contingency upon
which the signer became obligated to perform.
